Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-164.5] Federal tax exempt
status. Special purpose revenue bonds issued pursuant to this part, to the
extent practicable, shall be issued to comply with requirements imposed by
applicable federal law providing that the interest on the special purpose
revenue bonds shall be excluded from gross income for federal income tax
purposes (except as certain minimum taxes or environmental taxes may apply).
The director of finance may enter into agreements, establish funds or accounts,
and take any action required to comply with applicable federal law. Nothing in
this part shall be deemed to prohibit the issuance of special purpose revenue
bonds, the interest on which may be included in gross income for federal income
tax purposes. [L 1996, c 142, §4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next